language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.dic
ABC-bróni/0004
Bartrołm/0003
C-bróni/0004
Chójničance/0014
Hari/0003
IT-firma/0001
Jamaice/0014
Kai/0003
Maikop/0005
Milence/0014
Otilija/0012
Puhdy/0003
Sabrina/0001
Salt-konferenca/0002
Samowce/0014
Sawdi/0003
Swasi/0003
Toni/0003
Ural/0009
Wyli/0003
absint/0018
adresatce/0014
adwerb/0005
alternacija/0012
amnestijowa/0011
anestezist/0013
asfalt/0018
atestacisce/0015
average-case-analyza/0002
awra/0001
backslash/0009
bandit/0013
bandoneon/0005
betunija/0012
bjezpředłóžkowa/0016
bjezwobsydstwowa/0011
bohosłowstwa/0019
brakteat/0018
brigadnik/0010
bróni/0004
bufeteza/0002
běłonce/0014
chevreaučrij/0009
cholowa/0001
chwalobna/0008
cirkon/0005
ciwi/0003
covercoat/0018
dalekubłansce/0015
damastna/0011
darwinist/0013
defrawdacija/0012
deliberatiwna/0016
dieceza/0002
diskjockey/0003
dohladnistwa/0019
dowolnik/0010
dual/0009
duplikat/0018
duri/0004
dyba/0001
dynastija/0012
dźeržićelce/0014
dźiwiznowa/0011
e-mejlna/0016
eklekticizm/0005
ekshibicionist/0013
ekstrapolěruj/0017
ekwiwalentna/0008
epidemisce/0015
fagocyt/0018
fasla/0012
fejetonist/0013
financowstwa/0019
fotofinish/0009
galaprogam/0005
gerbera/0001
gladiola/0012
habitat/0018
haćena/0011
helenist/0013
hiobsce/0015
hnidlica/0002
hotowance/0014
hrabi/0004
hudźbnik/0010
hórkuš/0009
imperializm/0005
improwizacija/0012
inflacionarna/0008
inkulantna/0016
intendantura/0001
interwenient/0013
jednobójstwa/0019
jet/0018
jitni/0004
jogi/0003
jutni/0004
jězbna/0011
karbolinej/0009
kardiologija/0012
katalytisce/0015
kleskańca/0002
klif/0005
klimpotawa/0001
knihowničce/0014
kolchoznik/0010
kolumnist/0013
komanděruj/0017
konferencna/0016
konopi/0004
konwersija/0012
koridorowa/0011
korpuskl/0009
korčmarstwa/0019
kulantna/0008
kwart/0018
křćenik/0010
lagerist/0013
latifundij/0009
lektoratna/0016
liberalizm/0005
libjowce/0014
ludarstwa/0019
ludličensce/0015
lětnjowłóžna/0011
makojca/0002
matutina/0001
miliciant/0013
mixvolleyball/0009
morfinizm/0005
mostarstwa/0019
muri/0004
nabožinowědnik/0010
nadkošla/0012
nadrjewna/0008
nadzemsce/0015
najdwudomniša/0006
najkoketniša/0006
najnjedalša/0006
najpjećhranićiša/0006
najrozkorjeniša/0006
najturbulentniša/0006
najwěrnosćiwiša/0006
nanajaktualniša/0006
nanajeksteritorialniša/0006
nanajkorjenjeniša/0006
nanajnjemdriša/0006
nanajpomałša/0006
nanajrěčespytniša/0006
nanajwiskozniša/0006
neomarxist/0013
niksa/0002
njeakceleruj/0017
njeetiketuj/0017
njeidentifikujomna/0016
njekmanik/0010
njekonferuj/0017
njepaginuj/0017
njepřesedłuj/0017
njeracionelna/0008
njerozćiskuj/0017
njetučna/0011
njewjedra/0019
njewobrubuj/0017
njewuplacuj/0017
nomenklaturna/0016
nullouvert/0018
nóžni/0004
oktan/0005
palatalna/0008
parabolisce/0015
pascal/0009
paćeri/0004
perkusionist/0013
permakulturnik/0010
pjerchiznowce/0014
plana/0001
playboy/0003
pliocen/0005
polysynteza/0002
polěsnik/0010
populacija/0012
prancuj/0017
prawidłowna/0008
preglacialna/0011
primasprit/0018
prioritna/0016
programatisce/0015
prěnjowobsydstwa/0019
pseudowědomostnik/0010
płunoćišć/0009
přechwalbylakoma/0007
přeekstraordinarna/0007
přeindustrialna/0007
překružawa/0007
přenadalna/0007
přenjepřełožujomna/0007
přeortodoksna/0007
přepołskludna/0007
přereelna/0007
přespekulatiwna/0007
přetudomna/0007
přewotpohladna/0007
přezakosćena/0007
přečesćepołna/0007
přinošnik/0010
pšenica/0002
retrospektiwna/0008
rezerwist/0013
rjedźensce/0015
rjećazna/0016
rubježnik/0010
runa/0001
rychtarce/0014
rytm/0005
samopalena/0011
sani/0004
sektowstwa/0019
sekwestracija/0012
sideout/0018
sobupomocnica/0002
sprawna/0008
spóznawanskoteoretisce/0015
stencil/0009
swobodliwa/0016
sylnik/0010
słónčina/0001
teenie/0003
telegrafuj/0017
terapeut/0013
toaletowa/0011
trinom/0005
truhansce/0015
trust/0018
třicetnica/0002
třicećilětna/0008
wakcinacija/0012
wazalstwa/0019
wicepředsydce/0014
wotprošna/0016
wotłamliwa/0008
wujednansce/0015
wukonowa/0011
wulkoareal/0009
wulětnik/0010
wusahawa/0001
wójwodstwa/0019
włosa/0002
yuppie/0003
zapuchnjena/0008
zarjekuj/0017
zjednajomna/0016
čmuchotce/0014
čěransce/0015
šepjeri/0004
škleńčana/0008
šnica/0002
štalt/0018
štyristwowa/0011
šćerni/0004
žałbowarstwa/0019
žołmina/0001
